Hawaii statutes.
[§342I-26] Registration and recordkeeping
requirements. (a) All facilities that accept used tires, including but
not limited to tire retailers, wholesalers, transporters, collectors, and
recyclers, shall maintain, for a minimum of three years, records that provide,
at least, the following information:

(1) The name, phone number, and address of the
person, company, business, source, or entity from whom the used tires were
received, if receiving used tires from entities other than the general public,
such as tire retailers, wholesalers, transporters, collectors, and recyclers;

(2) The date of receipt of the used tires;

(3) The quantity of used tires received; and

(4) The record of shipment indicating the:

(A) Ultimate destination of the used tires;

(B) Identification of the transporter;

(C) Date of shipment; and

(D) Quantity of tires shipped.

Permitted municipal solid waste disposal facilities,
including incineration facilities that receive used tires incidental to the
disposal of municipal solid waste, shall be exempt from the recordkeeping
requirements of this section.

(b) A summary of the information maintained
under subsection (a) shall be submitted to the department by July 31 of each
year, listing the total quantity of used tires collected and the ultimate
disposition of the used tires.

(c) By September 1, 2000, all importers
operating within the State shall register with the department, using forms
prescribed by the department, and shall notify the department of any change in
address. After September 1, 2000, any person who desires to conduct business
in this State as an importer shall register with the department no later than
one month prior to the commencement of the business.

(d) All importers shall maintain records
reflecting the importation of tires. The records shall be made available, upon
request, for inspection by the department. [L 2000, c 173, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next